Hawaii statutes.
[§78-32] Payment of approved travel
costs for public officers and employees. (a) This section shall apply to
all approved travel costs incurred by an officer or employee of the State or a
county in connection with the official business of the respective jurisdiction.

(b) Subject to subsection (d), the State and
the counties may pay approved travel costs directly to:

(1) The vendor providing the goods or services
involved; or

(2) The officer or employee for whom the approved
travel costs are to be paid, by way of a cash advance prior to the date of
purchase, unless the officer or employee affirmatively agrees to loan the State
or a county the money for the travel costs and be reimbursed after the officer
or employee pays for the travel costs.

(c) This section shall not be construed as
precluding the reimbursement of approved travel costs to an officer or employee
upon completion of travel for any costs that for any reason were not paid by
the State or the county, as applicable, in accordance with subsection (b).

(d) As pertains to the officer or employee
incurring approved travel costs, whenever there is a conflict between a
collective bargaining agreement and this section, the terms of the collective
bargaining agreement shall prevail.

(e) For the purposes of this section,
"approved travel costs" means any determinable costs of travel for
official state or county business approved by the respective jurisdiction and
supported by a written invoice. The term includes the costs of transportation
to and from a destination point, between destination points, or within a
destination point; event registration fees; per diem allowances; and any other
necessary costs related to the travel.

(f) An employer shall not take adverse
employment actions against an officer or employee who does not affirmatively
agree to loan the State or a county the money for the travel costs and be
reimbursed after the officer or employee pays for the travel costs. [L 2016, c
158, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next